vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions-save.foma
  {Konserv} @-> {Консерв} ,,
  {KONSERV} @-> {КОНСЕРВ} ,,
  {konsi} @-> {конси} ,,
  {Konsi} @-> {Конси} ,,
  {KONSİ} @-> {КОНСИ} ,,
  {konteyner} @-> {контейнер} ,,
  {Konteyner} @-> {Контейнер} ,,
  {KONTEYNER} @-> {КОНТЕЙНЕР} ,,
  {konti} @-> {конти} ,,
  {Konti} @-> {Конти} ,,
  {KONTİ} @-> {КОНТИ} ,,
  {konfe} @-> {конфе} ,,
  {Konfe} @-> {Конфе} ,,
  {KONFE} @-> {КОНФЕ} ,,
  {konfi} @-> {конфи} ,,
  {Konfi} @-> {Конфи} ,,
  {KONFİ} @-> {КОНФИ} ,,
  {kontse} @-> {конце} ,,
  {Kontse} @-> {Конце} ,,
  {KONTSE} @-> {КОНЦЕ} ,,
  {konyu} @-> {конъю} ,,
  {Konyu} @-> {Конъю} ,,
  {KONYU} @-> {КОНЪЮ} ,,
  {konki} @-> {коньки} ,,
  {Konki} @-> {Коньки} ,,
  {KONKİ} @-> {КОНЬКИ} ,,
  {konyak} @-> {коньяк} ,,
  {Konyak} @-> {Коньяк} ,,
  {KONYAK} @-> {КОНЬЯК} ,,
  {kopirle} @-> {копирле} ,,
  {Kopirle} @-> {Копирле} ,,
  {KOPİRLE} @-> {КОПИРЛЕ} ,,
  {kopiya} @-> {копия} ,,
  {Kopiya} @-> {Копия} ,,
  {KOPİYA} @-> {КОПИЯ} ,,
  {korde} @-> {корде} ,,
  {Korde} @-> {Корде} ,,
  {KORDE} @-> {КОРДЕ} ,,
  {koreiz} @-> {кореиз} ,,
  {Koreiz} @-> {Кореиз} ,,
  {KOREİZ} @-> {КОРЕИЗ} ,,
  {korenn} @-> {коренн} ,,
  {Korenn} @-> {Коренн} ,,
  {KORENN} @-> {КОРЕНН} ,,
  {koreya} @-> {корея} ,,
  {Koreya} @-> {Корея} ,,
  {KOREYA} @-> {КОРЕЯ} ,,
  {koria} @-> {кориа} ,,
  {Koria} @-> {Кориа} ,,
  {KORİA} @-> {КОРИА} ,,
  {koridor} @-> {коридор} ,,
  {Koridor} @-> {Коридор} ,,
  {KORİDOR} @-> {КОРИДОР} ,,
  {korne} @-> {корне} ,,
  {Korne} @-> {Корне} ,,
  {KORNE} @-> {КОРНЕ} ,,
  {korneyev} @-> {корнеев} ,,
  {Korneyev} @-> {Корнеев} ,,
  {KORNEYEV} @-> {КОРНЕЕВ} ,,
  {korni} @-> {корни} ,,
  {Korni} @-> {Корни} ,,
  {KORNİ} @-> {КОРНИ} ,,
  {korre} @-> {корре} ,,
  {Korre} @-> {Корре} ,,
  {KORRE} @-> {КОРРЕ} ,,
  {kosme} @-> {косме} ,,
  {Kosme} @-> {Косме} ,,
  {KOSME} @-> {КОСМЕ} ,,
  {kosmik} @-> {космик} ,,
  {Kosmik} @-> {Космик} ,,
  {KOSMİK} @-> {КОСМИК} ,,
  {kostüm} @-> {костюм} ,,
  {Kostüm} @-> {Костюм} ,,
  {KOSTÜM} @-> {КОСТЮМ} ,,
  {koteln} @-> {котельн} ,,
  {Koteln} @-> {Котельн} ,,
  {KOTELN} @-> {КОТЕЛЬН} ,,
  {kotir} @-> {котир} ,,
  {Kotir} @-> {Котир} ,,
  {KOTİR} @-> {КОТИР} ,,
  {kotlet} @-> {котлет} ,,
  {Kotlet} @-> {Котлет} ,,
  {KOTLET} @-> {КОТЛЕТ} ,,
  {koçerg} @-> {кочерг} ,,
  {Koçerg} @-> {Кочерг} ,,
  {KOÇERG} @-> {КОЧЕРГ} ,,
  {köşe} @-> {коше} ,,
  {Köşe} @-> {Коше} ,,
  {KÖŞE} @-> {КОШЕ} ,,
  {kubi} @-> {куби} ,,
  {Kubi} @-> {Куби} ,,
  {KUBİ} @-> {КУБИ} ,,
  {kudrin} @-> {кудрин} ,,
  {Kudrin} @-> {Кудрин} ,,
  {KUDRİN} @-> {КУДРИН} ,,
  {kuznets} @-> {кузнец} ,,
  {Kuznets} @-> {Кузнец} ,,
  {KUZNETS} @-> {КУЗНЕЦ} ,,
  {kulinar} @-> {кулинар} ,,
  {Kulinar} @-> {Кулинар} ,,
  {KULİNAR} @-> {КУЛИНАР} ,,
  {kuliç} @-> {кулич} ,,
  {Kuliç} @-> {Кулич} ,,
  {KULİÇ} @-> {КУЛИЧ} ,,
  {kulmin} @-> {кульмин} ,,
  {Kulmin} @-> {Кульмин} ,,
  {KULMİN} @-> {КУЛЬМИН} ,,
  {kültaş} @-> {культаш} ,,
  {Kültaş} @-> {Культаш} ,,
  {KÜLTAŞ} @-> {КУЛЬТАШ} ,,
  {külte} @-> {культе} ,,
  {Külte} @-> {Культе} ,,
  {KÜLTE} @-> {КУЛЬТЕ} ,,
  {kult} @-> {культ} ,,
  {Kult} @-> {Культ} ,,
  {KULT} @-> {КУЛЬТ} ,,
  {kürkület} @-> {куркулет} ,,
  {Kürkület} @-> {Куркулет} ,,
  {KÜRKÜLET} @-> {КУРКУЛЕТ} ,,
  {kursiv} @-> {курсив} ,,
  {Kursiv} @-> {Курсив} ,,
  {KURSİV} @-> {КУРСИВ} ,,
  {kuşet} @-> {кушет} ,,
  {Kuşet} @-> {Кушет} ,,
  {KUŞET} @-> {КУШЕТ} ,,
  {küşkü} @-> {кушку} ,,
  {Küşkü} @-> {Кушку} ,,
  {KÜŞKÜ} @-> {КУШКУ} ,,
  {küyük} @-> {куюк} ,,
  {Küyük} @-> {Куюк} ,,
  {KÜYÜK} @-> {КУЮК} ,,
  {qolyazma} @-> {къолязма} ,,
  {Qolyazma} @-> {Къолязма} ,,
  {QOLYAZMA} @-> {КЪОЛЯЗМА} ,,
  {qurtümer} @-> {къуртумер} ,,
  {Qurtümer} @-> {Къуртумер} ,,
  {QURTÜMER} @-> {КЪУРТУМЕР} ,,
  {qurtüsein} @-> {къуртусеин} ,,
  {Qurtüsein} @-> {Къуртусеин} ,,
  {QURTÜSEİN} @-> {КЪУРТУСЕИН} ,,
  {medyun} @-> {медьюн} ,,
  {Medyun} @-> {Медьюн} ,,
  {MEDYUN} @-> {МЕДЬЮН} ,,
  {mesüli} @-> {месули} ,,
  {Mesüli} @-> {Месули} ,,
  {MESÜLİ} @-> {МЕСУЛИ} ,,
  {mefküre} @-> {мефкуре} ,,
  {Mefküre} @-> {Мефкуре} ,,
  {MEFKÜRE} @-> {МЕФКУРЕ} ,,
  {mögedek} @-> {могедек} ,,
  {Mögedek} @-> {Могедек} ,,
  {MÖGEDEK} @-> {МОГЕДЕК} ,,
  {mumiyo} @-> {мумиё} ,,
  {Mumiyo} @-> {Мумиё} ,,
  {MUMİYO} @-> {МУМИЁ} ,,
  {mumif} @-> {мумиф} ,,
  {Mumif} @-> {Мумиф} ,,
  {MUMİF} @-> {МУМИФ} ,,
  {müçe} @-> {муче} ,,
  {Müçe} @-> {Муче} ,,
  {MÜÇE} @-> {МУЧЕ} ,,
  {müyüz} @-> {муюз} ,,
  {Müyüz} @-> {Муюз} ,,
  {MÜYÜZ} @-> {МУЮЗ} ,,
  {nümüne} @-> {нумюне} ,,
  {Nümüne} @-> {Нумюне} ,,
  {NÜMÜNE} @-> {НУМЮНЕ} ,,
  {obel} @-> {обел} ,,
  {Obel} @-> {Обел} ,,
  {OBEL} @-> {ОБЕЛ} ,,
  {ober} @-> {обер} ,,
  {Ober} @-> {Обер} ,,
  {OBER} @-> {ОБЕР} ,,
  {obli} @-> {обли} ,,
  {Obli} @-> {Обли} ,,
  {OBLİ} @-> {ОБЛИ} ,,
  {obse} @-> {обсе} ,,
  {Obse} @-> {Обсе} ,,
  {OBSE} @-> {ОБСЕ} ,,
  {obt} @-> {обт} ,,
  {Obt} @-> {Обт} ,,
  {OBT} @-> {ОБТ} ,,
  {ogne} @-> {огне} ,,
  {Ogne} @-> {Огне} ,,
  {OGNE} @-> {ОГНЕ} ,,
  {odekolon} @-> {одеколон} ,,
  {Odekolon} @-> {Одеколон} ,,
  {ODEKOLON} @-> {ОДЕКОЛОН} ,,
  {odesa} @-> {одеса} ,,
  {Odesa} @-> {Одеса} ,,
  {ODESA} @-> {ОДЕСА} ,,
  {odessa} @-> {одесса} ,,
  {Odessa} @-> {Одесса} ,,
  {ODESSA} @-> {ОДЕССА} ,,
  {ozerki} @-> {озерки} ,,
  {Ozerki} @-> {Озерки} ,,
  {OZERKİ} @-> {ОЗЕРКИ} ,,
  {ozern} @-> {озерн} ,,
  {Ozern} @-> {Озерн} ,,
  {OZERN} @-> {ОЗЕРН} ,,
  {ozörn} @-> {озёрн} ,,
  {Ozörn} @-> {Озёрн} ,,
  {OZÖRN} @-> {ОЗЁРН} ,,
  {özüya} @-> {озюя} ,,
  {Özüya} @-> {Озюя} ,,
  {ÖZÜYA} @-> {ОЗЮЯ} ,,
  {okean} @-> {океан} ,,
  {Okean} @-> {Океан} ,,
  {OKEAN} @-> {ОКЕАН} ,,
  {oksi} @-> {окси} ,,
  {Oksi} @-> {Окси} ,,
  {OKSİ} @-> {ОКСИ} ,,
  {oktet} @-> {октет} ,,
  {Oktet} @-> {Октет} ,,
  {OKTET} @-> {ОКТЕТ} ,,
  {olea} @-> {олеа} ,,
  {Olea} @-> {Олеа} ,,
  {OLEA} @-> {ОЛЕА} ,,
  {olei} @-> {олеи} ,,
  {Olei} @-> {Олеи} ,,
  {OLEİ} @-> {ОЛЕИ} ,,
  {olenev} @-> {оленев} ,,
  {Olenev} @-> {Оленев} ,,
  {OLENEV} @-> {ОЛЕНЕВ} ,,
  {oliv} @-> {олив} ,,
  {Oliv} @-> {Олив} ,,
  {OLİV} @-> {ОЛИВ} ,,
  {olig} @-> {олиг} ,,
  {Olig} @-> {Олиг} ,,
  {OLİG} @-> {ОЛИГ} ,,
  {olimp} @-> {олимп} ,,
  {Olimp} @-> {Олимп} ,,
  {OLİMP} @-> {ОЛИМП} ,,
  {olif} @-> {олиф} ,,
  {Olif} @-> {Олиф} ,,
  {OLİF} @-> {ОЛИФ} ,,
  {ölçer} @-> {ольчер} ,,
  {Ölçer} @-> {Ольчер} ,,
  {ÖLÇER} @-> {ОЛЬЧЕР} ,,
  {omle} @-> {омле} ,,
  {Omle} @-> {Омле} ,,
  {OMLE} @-> {ОМЛЕ} ,,
  {onen} @-> {онен} ,,
  {Onen} @-> {Онен} ,,
  {ONEN} @-> {ОНЕН} ,,
  {onnen} @-> {оннен} ,,
  {Onnen} @-> {Оннен} ,,
  {ONNEN} @-> {ОННЕН} ,,
  {opera} @-> {опера} ,,
  {Opera} @-> {Опера} ,,
  {OPERA} @-> {ОПЕРА} ,,
  {opere} @-> {опере} ,,
  {Opere} @-> {Опере} ,,
  {OPERE} @-> {ОПЕРЕ} ,,
  {optim} @-> {оптим} ,,
  {Optim} @-> {Оптим} ,,
  {OPTİM} @-> {ОПТИМ} ,,
  {optsi} @-> {опци} ,,
  {Optsi} @-> {Опци} ,,
  {OPTSİ} @-> {ОПЦИ} ,,
  {orbi} @-> {орби} ,,
  {Orbi} @-> {Орби} ,,
  {ORBİ} @-> {ОРБИ} ,,
  {orden} @-> {орден} ,,
  {Orden} @-> {Орден} ,,
  {ORDEN} @-> {ОРДЕН} ,,
  {order} @-> {ордер} ,,
  {Order} @-> {Ордер} ,,
  {ORDER} @-> {ОРДЕР} ,,
  {ordin} @-> {ордин} ,,
  {Ordin} @-> {Ордин} ,,
  {ORDİN} @-> {ОРДИН} ,,
  {orea} @-> {ореа} ,,
  {Orea} @-> {Ореа} ,,
  {OREA} @-> {ОРЕА} ,,
  {oreh} @-> {орех} ,,
  {Oreh} @-> {Орех} ,,
  {OREH} @-> {ОРЕХ} ,,
  {oriyent} @-> {ориент} ,,
  {Oriyent} @-> {Ориент} ,,
  {ORİYENT} @-> {ОРИЕНТ} ,,
  {orkestr} @-> {оркестр} ,,
  {Orkestr} @-> {Оркестр} ,,
  {ORKESTR} @-> {ОРКЕСТР} ,,
  {orlin} @-> {орлин} ,,
  {Orlin} @-> {Орлин} ,,
  {ORLİN} @-> {ОРЛИН} ,,
  {orni} @-> {орни} ,,
  {Orni} @-> {Орни} ,,
  {ORNİ} @-> {ОРНИ} ,,
  {orhi} @-> {орхи} ,,
  {Orhi} @-> {Орхи} ,,
  {ORHİ} @-> {ОРХИ} ,,
  {ostsi} @-> {осци} ,,
  {Ostsi} @-> {Осци} ,,
  {OSTSİ} @-> {ОСЦИ} ,,
  {ofis} @-> {офис} ,,
  {Ofis} @-> {Офис} ,,
  {OFİS} @-> {ОФИС} ,,
  {ofits} @-> {офиц} ,,
  {Ofits} @-> {Офиц} ,,
  {OFİTS} @-> {ОФИЦ} ,,
  {ofset} @-> {офсет} ,,
  {Ofset} @-> {Офсет} ,,
  {OFSET} @-> {ОФСЕТ} ,,
  {oçerk} @-> {очерк} ,,
  {Oçerk} @-> {Очерк} ,,
  {OÇERK} @-> {ОЧЕРК} ,,
  {oyunnen} @-> {оюннен} ,,
  {Oyunnen} @-> {Оюннен} ,,
  {OYUNNEN} @-> {ОЮННЕН} ,,
  {pobed} @-> {побед} ,,
  {Pobed} @-> {Побед} ,,
  {POBED} @-> {ПОБЕД} ,,
  {polevo} @-> {полево} ,,
  {Polevo} @-> {Полево} ,,
  {POLEVO} @-> {ПОЛЕВО} ,,
  {poli} @-> {поли} ,,
  {Poli} @-> {Поли} ,,
  {POLİ} @-> {ПОЛИ} ,,
  {polüşko} @-> {полюшко} ,,
  {Polüşko} @-> {Полюшко} ,,
  {POLÜŞKO} @-> {ПОЛЮШКО} ,,
  {pomidor} @-> {помидор} ,,
  {Pomidor} @-> {Помидор} ,,
  {POMİDOR} @-> {ПОМИДОР} ,,
  {poniz} @-> {пониз} ,,
  {Poniz} @-> {Пониз} ,,
  {PONİZ} @-> {ПОНИЗ} ,,
  {porfir} @-> {порфир} ,,
  {Porfir} @-> {Порфир} ,,
  {PORFİR} @-> {ПОРФИР} ,,
  {potelov} @-> {потелов} ,,
  {Potelov} @-> {Потелов} ,,
  {POTELOV} @-> {ПОТЕЛОВ} ,,
  {pötük} @-> {потюк} ,,
  {Pötük} @-> {Потюк} ,,
  {PÖTÜK} @-> {ПОТЮК} ,,
  {poçetn} @-> {почетн} ,,
  {Poçetn} @-> {Почетн} ,,
  {POÇETN} @-> {ПОЧЕТН} ,,
  {poçötn} @-> {почётн} ,,
  {Poçötn} @-> {Почётн} ,,
  {POÇÖTN} @-> {ПОЧЁТН} ,,
  {pükle} @-> {пукле} ,,
  {Pükle} @-> {Пукле} ,,
  {PÜKLE} @-> {ПУКЛЕ} ,,
  {pürkü} @-> {пуркю} ,,
  {Pürkü} @-> {Пуркю} ,,
  {PÜRKÜ} @-> {ПУРКЮ} ,,
  {purümüt} @-> {пурумют} ,,
  {Purümüt} @-> {Пурумют} ,,
  {PURÜMÜT} @-> {ПУРУМЮТ} ,,
  {püskül} @-> {пускул} ,,
  {Püskül} @-> {Пускул} ,,
  {PÜSKÜL} @-> {ПУСКУЛ} ,,
  {püskür} @-> {пускур} ,,
  {Püskür} @-> {Пускур} ,,
  {PÜSKÜR} @-> {ПУСКУР} ,,
  {püsür} @-> {пусюр} ,,
  {Püsür} @-> {Пусюр} ,,
  {PÜSÜR} @-> {ПУСЮР} ,,
  {püfle} @-> {пуфле} ,,
  {Püfle} @-> {Пуфле} ,,
  {PÜFLE} @-> {ПУФЛЕ} ,,
  {seyitümer} @-> {сейитумер} ,,
  {Seyitümer} @-> {Сейитумер} ,,
  {SEYİTÜMER} @-> {СЕЙИТУМЕР} ,,
  {seyitüsein} @-> {сейитусеин} ,,
  {Seyitüsein} @-> {Сейитусеин} ,,
  {SEYİTÜSEİN} @-> {СЕЙИТУСЕИН} ,,
  {seyityağya} @-> {сейитягъя} ,,
  {Seyityağya} @-> {Сейитягъя} ,,
  {SEYİTYAĞYA} @-> {СЕЙИТЯГЪЯ} ,,
  {seyityagya} @-> {сейитягья} ,,
  {Seyityagya} @-> {Сейитягья} ,,
  {SEYİTYAGYA} @-> {СЕЙИТЯГЬЯ} ,,
  {seyityahya} @-> {сейитяхья} ,,
  {Seyityahya} @-> {Сейитяхья} ,,
  {SEYİTYAHYA} @-> {СЕЙИТЯХЬЯ} ,,
  {seyityaya} @-> {сейитяя} ,,
  {Seyityaya} @-> {Сейитяя} ,,
  {SEYİTYAYA} @-> {СЕЙИТЯЯ} ,,
  {seitümer} @-> {сеитумер} ,,
  {Seitümer} @-> {Сеитумер} ,,
  {SEİTÜMER} @-> {СЕИТУМЕР} ,,
  {seitüsein} @-> {сеитусеин} ,,
  {Seitüsein} @-> {Сеитусеин} ,,
  {SEİTÜSEİN} @-> {СЕИТУСЕИН} ,,
  {seityağya} @-> {сеитягъя} ,,
  {Seityağya} @-> {Сеитягъя} ,,
  {SEİTYAĞYA} @-> {СЕИТЯГЪЯ} ,,
  {seityagya} @-> {сеитягья} ,,
  {Seityagya} @-> {Сеитягья} ,,
  {SEİTYAGYA} @-> {СЕИТЯГЬЯ} ,,
  {seityahya} @-> {сеитяхья} ,,
  {Seityahya} @-> {Сеитяхья} ,,
  {SEİTYAHYA} @-> {СЕИТЯХЬЯ} ,,
  {seityaya} @-> {сеитяя} ,,
  {Seityaya} @-> {Сеитяя} ,,
  {SEİTYAYA} @-> {СЕИТЯЯ} ,,
  {süret} @-> {сурет} ,,
  {Süret} @-> {Сурет} ,,
  {SÜRET} @-> {СУРЕТ} ,,
  {uvertüra} @-> {увертюра} ,,
  {Uvertüra} @-> {Увертюра} ,,
  {UVERTÜRA} @-> {УВЕРТЮРА} ,,
  {ugle} @-> {угле} ,,
  {Ugle} @-> {Угле} ,,
  {UGLE} @-> {УГЛЕ} ,,
  {uzviy} @-> {узвий} ,,
  {Uzviy} @-> {Узвий} ,,
  {UZVİY} @-> {УЗВИЙ} ,,
  {ulitsa} @-> {улица} ,,
  {Ulitsa} @-> {Улица} ,,
  {ULİTSA} @-> {УЛИЦА} ,,
  {ultimat} @-> {ультимат} ,,
  {Ultimat} @-> {Ультимат} ,,
  {ULTİMAT} @-> {УЛЬТИМАТ} ,,
  {ultra} @-> {ультра} ,,
  {Ultra} @-> {Ультра} ,,
  {ULTRA} @-> {УЛЬТРА} ,,
  {ulyanov} @-> {ульянов} ,,
  {Ulyanov} @-> {Ульянов} ,,
  {ULYANOV} @-> {УЛЬЯНОВ} ,,
  {univer} @-> {универ} ,,
  {Univer} @-> {Универ} ,,
  {UNİVER} @-> {УНИВЕР} ,,
  {unik} @-> {уник} ,,
  {Unik} @-> {Уник} ,,
  {UNİK} @-> {УНИК} ,,
  {unis} @-> {унис} ,,
  {Unis} @-> {Унис} ,,
  {UNİS} @-> {УНИС} ,,
  {unit} @-> {унит} ,,
  {Unit} @-> {Унит} ,,
  {UNİT} @-> {УНИТ} ,,
  {unif} @-> {униф} ,,
  {Unif} @-> {Униф} ,,
  {UNİF} @-> {УНИФ} ,,
  {unter} @-> {унтер} ,,
  {Unter} @-> {Унтер} ,,
  {UNTER} @-> {УНТЕР} ,,
  {uryan} @-> {урьян} ,,
  {Uryan} @-> {Урьян} ,,
  {URYAN} @-> {УРЬЯН} ,,
  {util} @-> {утил} ,,
  {Util} @-> {Утил} ,,
  {UTİL} @-> {УТИЛ} ,,
  {utkin} @-> {уткин} ,,
  {Utkin} @-> {Уткин} ,,
  {UTKİN} @-> {УТКИН} ,,
  {uçebn} @-> {учебн} ,,
  {Uçebn} @-> {Учебн} ,,
  {UÇEBN} @-> {УЧЕБН} ,,
  {şovini} @-> {шовини} ,,
